Utah statutes.
17-3-6.   Effect on precincts and school and other districts --
Indebtedness.
All precincts, school districts, road districts, and election districts, as
they existed prior to the creation of such new county, shall continue and
become precincts, school districts, road districts, and election districts of
such new county, and the respective officers thereof shall hold office until
the expiration of the several terms for which they were elected or appointed;
provided, that wherever pursuant to the provisions of this chapter any
precinct, school district, road district, or election district shall be
divided the same shall be by reason thereof disorganized, and the property and
territory embraced therein shall be subject to the action of the county
legislative body of the respective counties as to reorganization thereof or
adding the same to other like subdivisions already organized; provided
further, that any bonded or other indebtedness of any such school district so
divided shall attach to and become the obligation of the district that shall
be created out of the territory that shall retain the buildings and other
property of the original district or to the district to which the same may be
added; and all bonded or other indebtedness of the county from which territory
is taken shall attach to and become the obligation of such county.
